California statutes. Vehicle Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 415, Sec. 2.   (SB 480)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

38751.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Emergency geofencing message” means a message delivered using commonly available communication methods to identify a location using a street address, intersection, coordinates, or any other reasonable and customary way of identifying a location, that directs an autonomous vehicle to leave or avoid an area because of
 an emergency.

(2) “Emergency response official” includes, but is not limited to, emergency dispatchers, peace officers as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, and first responders.

(3) “Emergency” means a sudden, unexpected occurrence demanding immediate action to prevent or mitigate loss or damage to life, health, property, or essential public services.

(b) A manufacturer
 shall comply with all of the following requirements:

(1) (A) A manufacturer operating an autonomous vehicle under a testing permit or deployment permit issued by the department shall maintain a dedicated emergency response telephone line that is available for emergency response officials during all hours when an autonomous vehicle is on a public road. The telephone line shall be available at no cost to public agencies.

(B) The manufacturer shall continuously monitor the status of each autonomous vehicle on a public road and shall equip and staff the telephone line to ensure that calls are picked up within 30 seconds by a remote human operator who has situational awareness of all autonomous vehicles on public roads.

(C) The remote human operator shall have the ability to immobilize the autonomous vehicle, allow an emergency response official to move the autonomous vehicle, or cause the autonomous vehicle to move as directed by an emergency response official.

(2) (A) A manufacturer operating an autonomous vehicle under a testing permit or deployment permit issued by the department shall equip each autonomous vehicle with a two-way voice communication device that enables emergency response officials that are near the vehicle to communicate effectively with a remote human operator who has situational awareness about the autonomous vehicle. The manufacturer shall ensure that an emergency response official is able to reach a remote human operator within 30 seconds after making
 a request through the device.

(B) The remote human operator shall have the ability to immobilize the autonomous vehicle, allow an emergency response official to move the autonomous vehicle, or cause the autonomous vehicle to move as directed by an emergency response official.

(3) Autonomous vehicles equipped with an override system in the vehicle that allows someone physically present to move the vehicle, pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (D) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 38750 shall provide access to the override system to law enforcement and firefighters in case of emergency to allow law enforcement and firefighters to completely immobilize the vehicle or cause the vehicle to move as necessary to address the emergency. The manufacturer shall provide training for law enforcement and firefighters on the use of the override system. The training shall be reviewed on a regular basis by the manufacturer and
 updated as changes are needed.

(c) The department shall not renew, reinstate, or approve an expansion of the operational design domain of a permit unless the manufacturer certifies that it is in full compliance with the requirements under subdivision (b).

(d) (1) An emergency response official may issue an emergency geofencing message to a manufacturer.

(2) Within two minutes of receiving an emergency geofencing message, a manufacturer shall issue direction to its fleet to leave or avoid the area identified.

(3) Within 30 business days of receiving a notice that an emergency response official wishes to begin issuing emergency geofencing messages, a manufacturer shall provide the emergency response official with all information necessary for the emergency response official to begin issuing and for the manufacturer to receive and respond to emergency geofencing messages.

(4) An emergency geofencing message shall include the initial duration for the defined avoidance area based on a reasonable assessment of the emergency. Where necessary, an emergency response official may extend the duration for the avoidance area.

(e) This section shall only apply to manufacturers of autonomous vehicles that
 operate without a human operator physically present in the vehicle.

(f) Paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (b) and subdivision (c) shall not apply to a commercial motor vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating or gross vehicle weight of at least 10,001 pounds, whichever is greater. This subdivision does not apply to a passenger transportation vehicle as defined in Section 464. The department may establish requirements by the adoption of regulations, determined in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, to ensure the safe interaction between autonomous commercial motor vehicles and emergency response
 officials.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 682, Sec. 2.   (AB 1777)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

38752.

(a) A “notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance” means a notice issued by a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, that identifies, at minimum, an alleged violation of this code or an alleged violation of a local traffic ordinance adopted pursuant to this code by an autonomous vehicle while the autonomous technology is engaged, the date, time, and location of the alleged violation, and the license plate number of the vehicle.

(b) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may issue a notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance upon observing an alleged violation of this code or an alleged violation of
 a local traffic ordinance adopted pursuant to this code.

(c) A manufacturer of an autonomous vehicle shall provide any issued notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance to the department within 72 hours of issuance, or within a timeframe otherwise determined by the department. The department shall make available a means by which the manufacturer can provide the notice.

(d) The issuance of a notice of autonomous vehicle noncompliance shall not create a presumption that the autonomous vehicle is unsafe and shall not limit the manufacturer’s ability to contest the nature or occurrence of an alleged violation identified in the notice.

(e) This section shall not become operative until the department issues regulations addressing notices of autonomous vehicle noncompliance, as required by Section
 38750.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 682, Sec. 3.   (AB 1777)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

38753.

The provisions of this division are severable. If any provision of this division or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 682, Sec. 4.   (AB 1777)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

38755.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 38750, the Contra Costa Transportation Authority is authorized to conduct a pilot project for the testing of autonomous vehicles that do not have a driver seated in the driver’s seat and are not equipped with a steering wheel, a brake pedal, or an accelerator provided the following requirements are met: 

(1) The testing shall be conducted only at a privately owned business park designated by the authority, inclusive of public roads within the designated business park, and
 at GoMentum Station located within the boundaries of the former Concord Naval Weapons Station.

(2) The autonomous vehicle shall operate at speeds of less than 35 miles per hour.

(b) A change in ownership of the property comprising the GoMentum Station shall not affect the authorization to conduct testing pursuant to this section.

(c) Prior to the start of the testing of an autonomous vehicle that does not have a driver seated in the driver’s seat on or across a public road, the Contra Costa Transportation Authority or a private entity, or
 a combination of the two, shall do both of the following:

(1) Obtain an instrument of insurance, surety bond, or proof of self-insurance in an amount of five million dollars ($5,000,000), and shall provide evidence of the insurance, surety bond, or proof of self-insurance to the Department of Motor Vehicles in the form and manner required by the department.

(2) Submit a detailed
 description of the testing program to the department. The detailed description shall include all of the following:

(A) Certification that, prior to testing on public roads, the autonomous vehicle has been tested under controlled conditions that simulate, as closely as practicable, the real world conditions that the autonomous vehicle will be subject to during this pilot project, and that the Contra Costa Transportation Authority or a private entity, or a combination of the two, has made a reasonable determination that it is safe to operate the autonomous vehicle on public roads under these conditions.

(B) Evidence satisfactory to the department that the City of San Ramon and any other local authorities with jurisdiction over the public roads in the designated privately owned
 business park approve of the geographic area and environmental, traffic, and speed conditions authorized for purposes of this pilot project.

(C) Certification that the autonomous vehicle can only operate in autonomous mode in the geographic area and environmental, traffic, and speed conditions authorized in this specific pilot project.

(D) Certification that this pilot project complies, or will comply, with National Highway Traffic Safety Administration guidance, if any, on the safe testing, deployment, and operation of autonomous vehicles.

(E) Certification that the autonomous vehicle used in the pilot project complies with all applicable federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards, or written evidence that the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration either considers the absence of a steering wheel, a brake pedal,
 or an accelerator permissible under federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards or has granted the autonomous vehicle an exemption from compliance with the relevant federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards.

(F) Identify to the department the autonomous vehicles that are to be tested on public roads during this pilot project. For each vehicle, the manufacturer shall provide to the department the make, model, and model year of the vehicle, the full vehicle identification number, and the license plate number and the state of issuance.

(G) Certification that the vehicle is equipped with a communication link between the vehicle and a remote operator to provide information on the vehicle’s location and status and to allow two-way communication between the remote operator and any passengers if the vehicle experiences any failures that would endanger the safety of the vehicle’s passengers or
 other road users while operating without a driver.

(H) Certification that the autonomous vehicle is designed to detect and respond to roadway conditions in compliance with all provisions of this code and local regulations applicable to the operation of motor vehicles.

(I) A copy of a law enforcement interaction plan, which includes information that the Contra Costa Transportation Authority or a private entity, or a combination of the two, will provide to the law enforcement agencies whose jurisdiction covers the designated privately owned business park to instruct those agencies on how to interact with the vehicle in emergency and traffic enforcement situations.

(d) The operator of the autonomous vehicle technology tested pursuant to this section shall disclose to an individual
 who participates in the pilot project what personal information, if any, concerning the pilot project participant is collected by an autonomous vehicle.

(e) For the testing of autonomous vehicles within the designated business park, the department may require data collection for evaluating the safety of the vehicles, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(1) A report to the department of any accident originating from the operation of the autonomous vehicle on a public road that resulted in the damage of property or in bodily injury or death. Accidents shall be reported within 10 days in the form and manner specified by the department pursuant to the regulations adopted by the department under Section 38750.

(2) The submission to the department of an annual report in the form and manner specified by the department pursuant to the regulations adopted under Section 38750 summarizing information on unplanned technology disengagements that occurred while the autonomous vehicle was being tested on public roads. “Disengagement” means a deactivation of the autonomous mode when a failure of the autonomous technology is detected or when the safe operation of the vehicle required disengagement from the autonomous mode.

(f) This section does not limit the authority of the department to promulgate regulations governing the
 testing and operation of autonomous vehicles on public roads, with or without the presence of a driver inside the vehicle, pursuant to Section 38750.

(g) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting the act that added this section, to address the specific circumstances of the pilot project proposed in the County of Contra Costa. Pursuant to Section 38750, the Department of Motor Vehicles is developing regulations for the testing and operation of autonomous vehicles, and it is not the intent of the Legislature to influence the content of those statewide regulations through the adoption of the act that added this section, which is only intended to govern the establishment of one local pilot project.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until 180 days after the operative date of regulations promulgated by the department to allow testing of autonomous vehicles without a driver in the vehicle, on which date any testing of autonomous vehicles by the Contra Costa Transportation Authority shall conform to those regulations, and as of the January 1 following that date this section is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before that January 1, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 814, Sec. 1.   (AB 1592)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed, by its own provisions, on January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 16.7. REGISTRATION AND LICENSING OF BICYCLES [39000. - 39011.]

39000.

“Bicycle”, for the purposes of this division, means any device upon which a person may ride, which is propelled by human power through a system of belts, chains, or gears having either two or three wheels (one of which is at least 20 inches in diameter) or having a frame size of at least 14 inches, or having four or more wheels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 421.)
-------------------------------------------

39001.

(a) The department shall procure and distribute bicycle license indicia and registration forms to all counties and cities which have adopted a bicycle licensing ordinance or resolution. Those counties and cities shall issue the indicia and registration form to the owner of any new bicycle, and may, upon request of the owner, issue an indicia and registration form to the owner of any bicycle which complies with Section 39007.

The department shall charge and collect a fee, not to exceed the cost of procuring and distributing the license indicia and registration form, for each bicycle license indicia and registration form issued. All fees collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund. Those fees are hereby continuously appropriated from the account for use by the department to defray costs to procure and distribute the bicycle license indicia and registration forms.

(b) The director shall design the bicycle license indicia and registration form described in subdivision (a), and shall establish procedures for the distribution of the indicia and registration form to counties and cities. The indicia shall be adhesive, durable, flexible, and of a size to permit it to be affixed to the front of the seat tube of the bicycle frame. Each indicia shall bear a unique license number and shall be permanently assigned to a bicycle. Each registration form shall comply with Section 39005.

(c) Bicycle licenses shall be renewed uniformly throughout the state on January 1 of the third year following the year of registration. Renewal of a bicycle license shall be indicated by a supplementary adhesive device affixed parallel to, and above or below, the indicia, with the expiration date showing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1268, Sec. 25.   Operative July 1, 1989, by Sec. 27 of Ch. 1268.)
-------------------------------------------

39002.

(a) A city or county, which adopts a bicycle licensing ordinance or resolution, shall not prohibit the operation of an unlicensed bicycle.

(b) It is unlawful for any person to tamper with, destroy, mutilate, or alter any license indicia or registration form, or to remove, alter, or mutilate the serial number, or the identifying marks of a licensing agency’s identifying symbol, on any bicycle frame licensed under this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 343, Sec. 7.   (AB 1909)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

39003.

If a city or county has or adopts a bicycle licensing ordinance or resolution, indicia and a copy of the registration form obtained from the department shall be issued to the owner by the city or county or other licensing agency designated by it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

39004.

Each licensing agency, by ordinance or resolution, may adopt rules and regulations for the collection of license fees. Revenues from license fees shall be retained by the licensing city or county and shall be used for the support of such bicycle ordinance or resolution, and may be used to reimburse retailers for services rendered. In addition, fees collected shall be used to improve bicycle safety programs and establish bicycle facilities, including bicycle paths and lanes, within the limits of the jurisdiction.

The fees required to be paid pursuant to this division are as follows:

(a) For each new bicycle license and registration certificate, the sum shall not exceed four dollars ($4) per year or any portion thereof.

(b) For each transfer of registration certificate, the sum shall not exceed two dollars ($2).

(c) For each replacement of a bicycle license or registration certificate, the sum shall not exceed two dollars ($2).

(d) For each bicycle license renewal, the sum shall not exceed two dollars ($2) per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 277, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

39005.

Cities and counties having a bicycle licensing ordinance or resolution shall maintain records of each bicycle registered. Such records shall include, but not be limited to, the license number, the serial number of the bicycle, the make and type, of the bicycle, and the name and address of the licensee.

Records shall be maintained by the licensing agency during the period of validity of the license or until notification that the bicycle is no longer to be operated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

39006.

(a) Each bicycle retailer and each bicycle dealer shall supply to each purchaser a preregistration form provided by the licensing agency and shall include, on the sales check or receipt given to the purchaser, a record of the following information: name of retailer, address of retailer, year and make of the bicycle, serial number of the bicycle if delivered to the purchaser in an assembled state, general description of the bicycle, name of purchaser, and address of purchaser. A copy of the preregistration form shall be filled out and forwarded by the purchaser to the appropriate licensing agency within 10 days from the date of sale.

(b) For the purposes of this division, a bicycle dealer is any person who sells, gives away, buys, or takes in trade for the purpose of resale, more than five bicycles in any one calendar year, whether or not such bicycles are owned by such person. “Bicycle dealer” also includes agents or employees of such person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

39007.

After December 31, 1976, no bicycle retailer shall sell any new bicycle in this state unless such bicycle has legibly and permanently stamped or cast on its frame a serial number, no less than one-eighth inch in size, and unique to the particular bicycle of each manufacturer. The serial number only shall be stamped or cast in the head of the frame, either side of the seat tube, the toeplate, or the bottom sprocket (crank) housing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

39008.

(a) Whenever any person sells or otherwise disposes of a bicycle, he shall endorse upon the registration certificate previously issued for such bicycle a written transfer of same, setting forth the name, address, telephone number of the transferee, date of transfer, and signature of the transferrer, and shall deliver the registration certificate, so endorsed, to the licensing agency within 10 days.

(b) Any person who purchases or otherwise acquires possession of a bicycle shall, within 10 days of taking possession, apply for the transfer of license to his own name. Cities and counties may establish rules and regulations to govern and enforce the provisions of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

39009.

(a) Whenever the owner of a bicycle licensed pursuant to an ordinance or resolution of a city or county changes his address, he shall within 10 days notify the appropriate licensing agency of the old and new address.

(b) In the event that any bicycle license indicia or registration form issued pursuant to the provisions of this division is lost, stolen, or mutilated, the licensee of such bicycle shall immediately notify the licensing agency, and, within 10 days after such notification, shall apply to the licensing agency for a duplicate license indicia or registration form. Thereupon, the licensing agency shall issue to such licensee a replacement indicia or registration form upon payment to the licensing agency of the appropriate fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1250.)
-------------------------------------------

39011.

No fine imposed for any violation of an ordinance or resolution, which is adopted pursuant to this division, shall exceed ten dollars ($10).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 400.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 17. OFFENSES AND PROSECUTION [40000.1. - 41610.]



CHAPTER 1. Offenses [40000.1. - 40273.]



  ARTICLE 1. Violation of Code [40000.1. - 40008.]

40000.1.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, it is unlawful and constitutes an infraction for any person to violate, or fail to comply with any provision of this code, or any local ordinance adopted pursuant to this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1178.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.3.

A violation expressly declared to be a felony, or a public offense which is punishable, in the discretion of the court, either as a felony or misdemeanor, or a willful violation of a court order which is punishable as contempt pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42003, is not an infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1162.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.5.

A violation of any of the following provisions shall constitute a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

Section 20, relating to false statements.

Section 27, relating to impersonating a member of the California Highway Patrol.

Section 31, relating to giving false information.

Paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), or subdivision (b), or both, of Section 221, relating to proper evidence of clearance for dismantling.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 316, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.6.

A violation of any of the following is a misdemeanor and not an infraction:

(a) Subdivision (b) of Section 1808.1, relating to enrollment in the pull notice system. 

(b) Subdivision (f) of Section 1808.1, relating to employment of disqualified drivers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 928, Sec. 37.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.61.

A violation of Section 1808.45, relating to unauthorized disclosure of department records, is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1213, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.65.

A violation of Section 2430.5 or 2432, relating to emergency road service, is a misdemeanor and not an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 488, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.7.

(a) A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(1) Section 2416, relating to regulations for emergency vehicles.

(2) Section 2800, relating to failure to obey an officer’s lawful order or submit to a lawful inspection.

(3) Section 2800.1, relating to fleeing from a peace officer.

(4) Section 2801, relating to failure to obey a firefighter’s lawful order.

(5) Section 2803, relating
 to unlawful vehicle or load.

(6) Section 2813, relating to stopping for inspection.

(7) Subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 4461 and subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 4463, relating to disabled person placards and disabled person and disabled veteran license plates.

(8) Section 4462.5, relating to deceptive or false evidence of vehicle registration.

(9) Section 4463.5, relating to deceptive or facsimile license plates.

(10) Section 5500, relating to the surrender of registration documents and license plates before dismantling may begin.

(11) Section 5506, relating to the sale of a total loss salvage vehicle, or of a vehicle reported for dismantling by a salvage vehicle rebuilder.

(12) Section 5753, relating to delivery of certificates of ownership and registration when committed by a dealer or any person while a dealer within the preceding 12 months.

(13) Section 5901, relating to dealers and lessor-retailers giving notice.

(14) Section 5901.1, relating to lessors giving notice and failure to pay fee.

(15) Section 8802, relating to the
 return of canceled, suspended, or revoked certificates of ownership, registration cards, or license plates, when committed by any person with intent to defraud.

(16) Section 8803, relating to return of canceled, suspended, or revoked documents and license plates of a dealer, manufacturer, remanufacturer, transporter, dismantler, or salesman.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 709, Sec. 26.   (SB 1062)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.70.

A violation of Section 23112.5, relating to notification of an on-highway hazardous material or hazardous waste spill, is a misdemeanor and not an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 429, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.77.

A violation of Article 7 (commencing with Section 2570) of Chapter 2.5 of Division 2, relating to transportation of school pupils, is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1563, Sec. 62.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.8.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

Section 9872, relating to the registration of vessels. 

Section 9872.1, relating to unidentified vessels.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 922, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.9.

A violation of any of the following provisions shall constitute a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

Section 10501, relating to false report of vehicle theft.

Sections 10750 and 10751, relating to altered or defaced vehicle identifying numbers.

Section 10851.5, relating to theft of binder chains.

Sections 10852 and 10853, relating to injuring or tampering with a vehicle.

Section 10854, relating to unlawful use of stored vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1178.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.10.

A violation of subdivision (a) of Section 12500 shall be punished as follows:

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), as an infraction by a fine of one hundred dollars ($100) for a first or second violation.

(b) As a misdemeanor or an infraction as prescribed by Section 19.8 of the Penal Code if a person has a prior driver’s license suspension or revocation for a violation of subdivision (c) of Section 192 of the Penal Code, subdivision (e) of Section 12809, or of Section 13353, 13353.1, 13353.2, 23103, 23104, 23105, 23109, 23152, 23153, or 23154.

(c) As a
 misdemeanor or an infraction as prescribed by Section 19.8 of the Penal Code for a third or subsequent violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 20.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.11.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(a) Division 5 (commencing with Section 11100), relating to occupational licensing and business regulations.

(b) Section 12515, subdivision (b), relating to persons under 21 years of age driving, and the employment of those persons to drive, vehicles engaged in interstate commerce or transporting hazardous substances or wastes.

(c) Section 12517, relating to a special driver’s certificate to operate a schoolbus or school pupil activity bus.

(d) Section 12517.45, relating to a special driver’s certificate
 and vehicle inspection for the transportation of pupils to or from school-related activities by a passenger charter-party carrier as defined in subdivision (k) of Section 545.

(e) Section 12519, subdivision (a), relating to a special driver’s certificate to operate a farm labor vehicle.

(f) Section 12520, relating to a special driver’s certificate to operate a tow truck.

(g) Section 12951, subdivision (b), relating to refusal to display license.

(h) Section 13004, relating to unlawful use of an identification card.

(i) Section 13004.1, relating to identification documents.

(j) Sections 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, and 14601.5,
 relating to driving with a suspended or revoked driver’s license.

(k) Section 14604, relating to unlawful use of a vehicle.

(l) Section 14610, relating to unlawful use of a driver’s license.

(m) Section 14610.1, relating to identification documents.

(n) Section 15501, relating to use of false or fraudulent license by a minor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 218.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.13.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(a) Section 16560, relating to interstate highway carriers.

(b) Sections 20002 and 20003, relating to duties at accidents.

(c) Section 21200.5, relating to riding a bicycle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug.

(d) Subdivision (b) of Section 21651, relating to wrong-way driving on divided highways.

(e) Subdivision (c) of Section
 21655.9, relating to illegal use of decals, labels, or other identifiers.

(f) Section 22520.5, a second or subsequent conviction of an offense relating to vending on or near freeways.

(g) Section 22520.6, a second or subsequent conviction of an offense relating to roadside rest areas and vista points.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until the date that the Secretary of State receives the notice from the Director of Transportation as described in Section 5205.5, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 614, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 215, Sec. 3.   (SB 535)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Repealed on date prescribed by its own provisions.   See later operative version, as amended by Sec. 4 of Ch. 215.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.13.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(a) Section 16560, relating to interstate highway carriers.

(b) Sections 20002 and 20003, relating to duties at accidents.

(c) Section 21200.5, relating to riding a bicycle while under the influence of an alcoholic beverage or any drug.

(d) Subdivision (b) of Section 21651, relating to wrong-way driving on divided highways.

(e) Section 22520.5, a second or
 subsequent conviction of an offense relating to vending on or near freeways.

(f) Section 22520.6, a second or subsequent conviction of an offense relating to roadside rest areas and vista points.

(g) This section shall become operative on the date that the Secretary of State receives the notice from the Director of Transportation as described in Section 5205.5.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 614, Sec. 6) by Stats. 2010, Ch. 215, Sec. 4.   (SB 535)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Section operative on date prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.14.

A violation of subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 21367 is an infraction, except as follows:

(a) A willful violation is a misdemeanor.

(b) A willful violation committed in a manner exhibiting a wanton disregard for the safety of persons is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 748, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.15.

A violation of any of the following provisions shall constitute a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

Subdivision (g), (j), (k), (l), or (m) of Section 22658, relating to unlawfully towed or stored vehicles.

Sections 23103 and 23104, relating to reckless driving.

Section 23109, relating to speed contests or exhibitions.

Subdivision (a) of Section 23110, relating to throwing at vehicles.

Section 23152, relating to driving under the influence.

Subdivision (b) of Section 23222, relating to possession of marijuana.

Subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 23224, relating to persons under 21 years of age knowingly driving, or being a passenger in, a motor vehicle carrying any alcoholic beverage.

Section 23253, relating to directions on toll highways or vehicular crossings.

Section 23332, relating to trespassing.

Section 24002.5, relating to unlawful operation of a farm vehicle.

Section 24011.3, relating to vehicle bumper strength notices.

Section 27150.1, relating to sale of exhaust systems.

Section 27362, relating to child passenger seat restraints.

Section 28050, relating to true mileage driven.

Section 28050.5, relating to nonfunctional odometers.

Section 28051, relating to resetting odometers.

Section 28051.5, relating to devices to reset odometers.

Subdivision (d) of Section 28150, relating to possessing four or more jamming devices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 609, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.16.

A second or subsequent violation of Section 23114, relating to preventing the escape of materials from vehicles, occurring within two years of a prior violation of that section is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 945, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.18.

A violation of subdivision (b) of Section 31401 or Section 31402 or 31403, relating to farm labor vehicles, is a misdemeanor and not an infraction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 613, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.19.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(a) Section 31303, relating to transportation of hazardous waste.

(b) Division 14 (commencing with Section 31600), relating to transportation of explosives.

(c) Division 14.1 (commencing with Section 32000), relating to the transportation of hazardous material.

(d) Division 14.3 (commencing with Section 32100), relating to transportation of inhalation hazards.

(e) Division 14.5 (commencing with Section 33000), relating to transportation of radioactive materials.

(f) Division 14.7 (commencing with Section 34001), relating to flammable liquids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1384, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.20.

A third or subsequent violation of Section 23225, relating to the storage of an opened container of an alcoholic beverage, or Section 23223, relating to the possession of an open container of an alcoholic beverage, by a driver of a vehicle used to provide transportation services on a prearranged basis, operating under a valid certificate or permit pursuant to the Passenger Charter-party Carriers’ Act (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5351) of Division 2 of the Public Utilities Code), is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 198.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.21.

A violation of any of the following provisions is a misdemeanor, and not an infraction:

(a) Subdivision (a) of Section 34506, relating to the hours of service of drivers.

(b) Subdivision (b) of Section 34506, relating to the transportation of hazardous materials.

(c) Subdivision (c) of Section 34506, relating to schoolbuses.

(d) Subdivision (d) of Section 34506, relating to youth buses.

(e) Section 34505 or subdivision (e) of Section 34506, relating to tour buses.

(f) Section 34505.5 or subdivision (f) of Section 34506, relating to vehicles described in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, of Section 34500.

(g) Subdivision (a) of Section 34501.3, relating to unlawful scheduling of runs by motor carriers.

(h) Subdivision (g) of Section 34506, relating to school pupil activity buses.

(i) Subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 34505.9, relating to intermodal chassis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 340, Sec. 4.   Effective August 24, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

40000.22.

(a) A violation of subdivision (e) of Section 34501, subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 34501.12, or subdivision (c) of Section 34501.14, relating to applications for inspections, is a misdemeanor and not an infraction.
